Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2135.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 6055YH (4) 91 as/js H.F. 2135 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 701.14 Limitation on discovery 1 depositions involving minor victims. 2 1. Except as provided in subsection 2, discovery 3 depositions shall not be permitted in any criminal action when 4 all of the following apply: 5 a. The victim is a minor at the time of the deposition. 6 b. The victim has given a statement by video and audio 7 recording that describes the conduct that constitutes the 8 elements of the charged offense, which recording was all of the 9 following: 10 (1) Obtained by a forensic interviewer employed by an 11 accredited child advocacy center or child protection center. 12 (2) Conducted substantially in accordance with a nationally 13 recognized protocol for interviewing children. 14 2. Notwithstanding subsection 1, discovery depositions 15 shall be permitted in a criminal action involving a minor 16 victim upon application to the court and a showing of 17 exceptional circumstances. 18